chrome/third_party/hunspell/dictionaries/lt_LT.aff
SFX E o       ančiosioms      o         
SFX E o       ančiąsias       o         
SFX E o       ančiosiomis     o         
SFX E o       ančiosiose      o         
SFX E i       intysis         [^s]i     
SFX E i       intįjį          [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojo         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajam        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuoju        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajame       [^s]i     
SFX E i       intieji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiųjų         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuosius      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiaisiais     [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuosiuose    [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčioji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosios       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajai        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąją         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąja         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojoj        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojoje       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosioms      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąsias       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosiomis     [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosiose      [^s]i     
SFX E i       intysis         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intįjį          [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojo         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajam        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuoju        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajame       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intieji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiųjų         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuosius      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiaisiais     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuosiuose    [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčioji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosios       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajai        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąją         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąja         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojoj        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojoje       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosioms      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąsias       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosiomis     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosiose      [^aoi]si  
SFX E 0       mas             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mo              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mam             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mą              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mu              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mame            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mi              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mų              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miems           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mus             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mais            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muose           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       ma              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mos             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mai             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moje            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moj             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moms            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       momis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mose            [aoi]     
SFX E si      masi            [aoi]si   
SFX E 0       mesnis          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnio          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniam         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnį           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniu          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniame        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnių          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniems        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnius         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniais        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnė           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnės          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnei          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnėje         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnėj          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnėms         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnėmis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnėse         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausias        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausio         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiam        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausią         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiu         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiame       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausių         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiems       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausius        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiais       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuose      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausia         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausos         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiai        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausoje        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausoj         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausios        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausioms       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiomis      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       masis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojo            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majam           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąjį            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muoju           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majame          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mieji           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mųjų            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miesiems        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosius         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       maisiais        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosiuose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moji            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosios          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majai           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąją            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąja            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoje          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoj           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosioms         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąsias          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiomis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiose         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnysis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojo        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajam       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnįjį         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuoju       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajame      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnieji        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniųjų        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniesiems     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuosius     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniaisiais    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnioji        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosios      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajai       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniąją        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniąja        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojoje      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojoj       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosioms     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniasias      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosiomis    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosiose     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiasis      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojo       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajam      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiąjį       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuoju      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajame     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausieji       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiųjų       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiesiems    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuosius    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausioji       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosios     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajai      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiąją       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiąja       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojoje     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojoj      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosioms    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiasias     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosiose    [aoi]     
